Utah statutes.
61-2-20.   Rights and privileges of real estate licensees to fill out forms
or documents.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a real estate licensee may fill out
only those legal forms approved by the commission and the attorney general,
and those forms provided by statute.
(2) (a) (i)  A principal broker may fill out any documents associated with the
closing of a real estate transaction.
(ii)  A branch broker or associate broker may fill out any documents
associated with the closing of a real estate transaction if designated to fill
out the documents by the principal broker with whom the branch broker or
associate broker is affiliated.
(b)  A real estate licensee may fill out real estate forms prepared by legal
counsel of the buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee.
(c)  If the commission and the attorney general have not approved a specific
form for the transaction, a principal broker, associate broker, or sales agent
may fill out real estate forms prepared by any legal counsel, including legal
counsel retained by the brokerage to develop these forms.
(3)  The commission may by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, provide a process for the approval of a
legal form under this section by the commission and the attorney general.
